Massachusetts, session 194th, H4684.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section XXXX is added to the Massachusetts Penal Code, to read:
MGL Chapter 41, Section 98
(a) A law enforcement officer shall not wear any mask or personal disguise while
interacting with the public in the performance of their duties, except for medical grade masks
that are surgical or N95 respirators designed to prevent the transmission of airborne diseases and
masks designed to protect against exposure to smoke or toxins during a state of emergency.
(b) A violation of this section shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.
(c) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to ensure that Special
Weapons and Tactics (SWAT) team officers can utilize gear necessary to protect their faces from
physical harm while they perform their SWAT responsibilities.
of 2

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to require law enforcement
officers to include their name or badge number on their uniforms.
(d) For the purposes of this section, “law enforcement officer” means any officer of a
local, state, or federal law enforcement agency, or any person acting on behalf of a local, state, or
federal law enforcement agency.
(e) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its
application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can
be given effect without the invalid provision or application.
No cost or reimbursement is required by this act
of 2